en: Medicine/Supplement form: Ampoule; Caplet; Capsules; Chewable tablets; Drops; Effervescent tablets; Gel; Granules; Liquid; Lozenges; Oil; Pill; Powder; Softgel; Spray; Syrup; Tablets; Other
hr-HR: Oblike lijeka / dodatka prehrani: Ampula; Film-tableta; Kapsule; Tablete za žvakanje; Kapi; Šumeće tablete; Gel; Granule; Tekućina; Pastile; Ulje; Pilula; Prah; Gel-kapsula; Sprej; Sirup; Tablete; Ostalo
lt-LT: Vaisto / maisto papildo pavidalas: Ampulė; Tabletė su apvalkalu; Kapsulės; Kramtomosios tabletės; Lašai; Šnypščiosios tabletės; Gelis; Granulės; Skystis; Pastilės; Aliejus; Tabletė; Milteliai; Gelinės kapsulės; Purškalas; Sirupas; Tabletės; Kita
nl: Vorm medicijn/supplement: Ampul; Capsule; Capsules; Kauwtabletten; Druppels; Bruistabletten; Gel; Korrels; Vloeistof; Zuigtabletten; Olie; Pil; Poeder; Softgel; Spray; Siroop; Tabletten; Andere
nb: Medisin-/kosttilskuddsform: Ampulle; Kaplett; Kapsler; Tyggetabletter; Dråper; Brusetabletter; Gel; Granulat; Væske; Pastiller; Olje; Pille; Pulver; Softgel; Spray; Sirup; Tabletter; Annen
ro-RO: Formă medicament/supliment: Fiolă; Comprimat; Capsule; Tablete masticabile; Picături; Tablete efervescente; Gel; Granule; Lichid; Drajeuri; Ulei; Pilulă; Pudră; Gel moale; Spray; Sirop; Tablete; Altele
zh-CN: 药品/补充剂形态: 安瓿; 帽子; 胶囊; 咀嚼片; 滴; 泡腾片; 发胶; 颗粒; 液体; 菱形块糖; 润滑油; 丸; 粉末; 软胶囊; 喷雾; 糖浆; 片剂; 其他
sk-SK: Forma lieku/doplnku: Ampulka; Filmom obalená tabletka; Kapsuly; Žuvacie tabletky; Kvapky; Šumivé tabletky; Gél; Granule; Kvapalina; Pastilky; Olej; Pilulka; Prášok; Softgel; Sprej; Sirup; Tablety; Iné
vi: Mẫu thuốc/thực phẩm bổ sung: Ống thuốc tiêm; Viên nhỏ; Trà viên; Viên nén nhai; Giọt; Thuốc sủi bọt; Gel; Các hột nhỏ; Liquid; Viên ngậm; Dầu; Viên thuốc; Bột; Viên nang mềm; Dạng xịt; Si-rô; Viên nén; Khác
da: Form for medicin/kosttilskud: Ampul; Kaplet; Kapsler; Tyggetabletter; Dråber; Brusetabletter; Gel; Granulater; Væske; Pastiller; Olie; Pille; Pulver; Softgel; Spray; Sirup; Tabletter; Andet
pt-PT: Forma de suplemento/medicamento alimentar: Ampola; Capote; Cápsulas; Comprimidos mastigáveis; Gotas; Comprimidos efervescentes; Gel; Granulados; Líquido; Pastilhas; Óleo; Comprimido; Pó; Cápsula mole; Pulverizador; Xarope; Tablets; Outro
th: รูปแบบยา/อาหารเสริม: แอมพูล; แคปเล็ต; แคปซูล; เม็ดเคี้ยว; หยด; เม็ดฟู่; เจล; เม็ดเล็ก; แบบเหลว; เม็ดอม; น้ำมัน; ยา; แบบผง; ซอฟท์เจล; สเปรย์; น้ำเชื่อม; แท็บเล็ต; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 藥品/保健食品形式: 安瓿; 囊片; 膠囊; 咀嚼片; 滴狀; 發泡錠; 凝膠; 顆粒; 液態; 含片; 油; 丸; 粉末; 軟膠囊; 噴霧; 糖漿; 片劑; 其他
pl: Forma leku/suplementu: Ampułka; Kapletka; Kapsułki; Tabletki do rozgryzania i żucia; Krople; Tabletki musujące; Żel; Granulki; Płyn; Pastylki do ssania; Ropa naftowa; Pigułka; Proszek; Kapsułka; Natrysk; Syrop; Tabletki; Pozostałe
el: Μορφή φαρμάκου/συμπληρώματος: Αμπούλα; Καψάκιο; Κάψουλες; Μασώμενα δισκία; Σταγόνες; Αναβράζοντα δισκία; Τζελ; Κόκκοι; Υγρό; Παστίλιες; Έλαιο; Χάπι; Σκόνη; Μαλακή γέλη; Σπρέι; Σιρόπι; Ταμπλέτες; Άλλο
ru: Форма лекарства/добавки: Ампула; Каплет; Капсулы; Жевательные таблетки; Капли; Шипучие таблетки; Гель; Гранулы; Жидкость; Леденцы; Масло; Пилюля; Порошок; Мягкая капсула; Спрей; Сироп; Таблетки; Другое
de: Arzneimittel-/Ergänzungsmittelform: Ampulle; Caplet-Tablette; Kapseln; Kautabletten; Tropfen; Brausetabletten; Gel; Granulat; Flüssig; Lutschtabletten; Öl; Pille; Puder; Softgel; Spray; Sirup; Tabletten; Sonstiges
ja: 医薬品/サプリメントフォーム: アンプル; カプレット; カプセル; チュアブル錠; ドロップ; 発泡錠剤; ゲル; 顆粒; リキッド; トローチ; オイル; ピル; パウダー; ソフトジェル; スプレー; シロップ; 錠剤; その他
tr: İlaç / Takviye şekli: Ampul; Kaplet; Kapsüller; Çiğnenebilir haplar; Damla; Efervesan tabletler; Jel; Granüller; Sıvı; Desenli; Yağ; Hap; Pudra; Yumuşak jel; Sprey; Şurup; Tabletler; Diğer
fr: Forme de médicament/supplément: Ampoule; Cachet; Capsules; Comprimés à croquer; Gouttes; Comprimés effervescents; Gel; Granulés; Liquide; Pastilles; Huile; Comprimé; Poudré; Gélule; Vaporisateur; Sirop; Comprimés; Autre
sv: Form av medicin/tillskott: Ampull; Caplet; Kapslar; Tuggtabletter; Droppar; Brustabletter; Gel; Granulat; Vätska; Tabletter; Olja; Piller; Pulver; Softgel; Spray; Sirap; Tabletter; Annat
sl-SI: Oblika zdravila/dopolnila: Ampula; Kapleta; Kapsule; Žvečljive tablete; Kapljice; Šumeče tablete; Gel; Granule; Tekočina; Pastile; Olje; Tableta; Prašek; Softgel; Razpršilo; Sirup; Tablete; Drugo
ko: 의약품/보충제 형태: 앰풀; 캐플릿; 캡슐; 씹어먹는 정제; 드롭; 발포 정제; 젤; 과립; 액상; 로젠지; 오일; 알약; 가루; 소프트젤; 스프레이; 시럽; 정제; 기타
es: Forma de la medicina/suplemento: Ampolla; Cápsula; Cápsulas; Tabletas masticables; Gotas; Pastillas efervescentes; Gel; Gránulos; Líquido; Pastillas; Aceite; Píldora; Polvo; Cápsula blanda; Aerosol; Sirope; Tabletas; Otros
bg-BG: Форма на хранителна добавка/лекарство: Ампула; Каплет; Капсули; Дъвчащи таблетки; Капки; Ефервесцентни таблетки; Гел; Гранули; Течност; Таблетки за смучене; Масло; Хапче; Пудра; Софтгел; Спрей; Сироп; Таблетки; Други
it: Modulo medicinali/integratori: Fiala; Compresse; Capsule; Compresse masticabili; Gocce; Compresse effervescenti; Gel; Granuli; Liquido; Pastiglie da sciogliere in bocca; Olio; Pillola; Polvere; Softgel; Spray; Sciroppo; Pastiglie; Altro
fi: Lääkkeiden ja ravintolisien muoto: Ampulli; Tabletti; Kapselit; Purutabletit; Pisarat; Poretabletit; Geeli; Rakeet; Nestemäinen; Kurkkupastillit; Öljyt; Pilleri; Jauhe; Pehmeä geeli; Suihke; Siirappi; Tabletit; Muu
pt-BR: Formato de medicamento/suplemento: Ampola; Cápsula; Cápsulas; Comprimidos mastigáveis; Gotas; Comprimidos efervescentes; Gel; Grãos; Líquido; Pastilhas; Óleo; Comprimido; Pó; Cápsula gelatinosa; Spray; Xarope; Comprimidos; Outro
cs: Forma léku/doplňku stravy: Ampule; Kapsle; Kapsle; Žvýkací tablety; Kapky; Šumivé tablety; Gel; Granule; Kapalina; Pastilky; Olej; Pilulky; Prášek; Měkké gely; Sprej; Sirupy; Tablety; Jiné
hu: Gyógyszer/étrend-kiegészítő megjelenési formája: Ampulla; Pirula; Kapszula; Rágótabletta; Cseppek; Pezsgőtabletta; Gél; Granulátum; Folyadék; Pasztilla; Olaj; Tabletta; Por; Lágyzselé; Spray; Szirup; Tabletta; Egyéb